Utah statutes.
63G-6a-612.   Conduct of reverse auction.

(1)  When conducting a reverse auction, the division or a procurement unit with independent procurement authority:

(a)  may conduct the reverse auction at a physical location or by electronic means;

(b)  shall permit all prequalified bidders to participate in the reverse auction;

(c)  may not permit a bidder to participate in the reverse auction if the bidder did not prequalify to participate in the reverse auction;

(d)  may not accept a bid after the time for submission of a bid has expired;

(e)  shall update the bids on a real time basis; and

(f)  shall conduct the reverse auction in a manner that permits each bidder to:

(i)  bid against each other; and

(ii)  lower the bidder's price below the lowest bid before the reverse auction closes.

(2)  At the end of the reverse auction, the procurement unit shall:

(a)  award the contract as soon as practicable to the lowest responsive and responsible bidder who meets the objective criteria described in the invitation for bids; or

(b)  cancel the reverse auction without awarding a contract.

(3)  After the reverse auction is finished, the procurement officer shall make publicly available:

(a) (i)  the amount of the final bid submitted by each bidder during the reverse auction; and

(ii)  the identity of the bidder that submitted each final bid; and

(b)  if practicable:

(i)  the amount of each bid submitted during the reverse auction; and

(ii)  the identity of the bidder that submitted each bid.



Amended by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

